Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 3. Public Building Facilities for Persons with Disabilities.

§ 43-6-101.
Applicability of standards.

The State Building Commission, the boards of supervisors of each county, the governing authorities of each municipality and the governing authorities of all political subdivisions of this state, pursuant to an order of the state board of health, shall cause to be constructed such entrance ramps to facilitate ingress and egress in each public building under the supervision of the said governing bodies, including buildings which presently exist, which are presently under construction, or which may be constructed after July 1, 1972. The standards and specifications set forth in Sections 43-6-103 through 43-6-121 shall apply to all buildings of assembly, educational institutions, office buildings, and other public buildings which are constructed in whole or in part by the use of state, county or municipal funds, or the funds of any instrumentality of the state, except where such compliance is impractical in the opinion of the state board of health. All such buildings and facilities in this state on which design contracts are awarded after July 1, 1972, shall conform to each of the standards and specifications prescribed therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-101; Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-103.
Primary entrances.

At least one (1) primary entrance to each building shall be accessible by individuals in wheelchairs from a point of vehicular arrival and such access shall be by means of a walk or walks at least forty-eight (48) inches wide and having a gradient not greater than five percent (5%), or eight and thirty-three one-hundredths percent (8.33%) with handrails. These walks shall be of a continuing surface, not interrupted by steps or abrupt changes in level. Wherever walks cross other walks, driveways, or parking lots they shall blend to a common level. A walk shall have a level platform at the top which is at least five (5) feet by five (5) feet, if a door swings out onto the platform or toward the walk. This platform shall extend at least one (1) foot beyond each side of the doorway. A walk shall have a level platform at least three (3) feet deep and five (5) feet wide, if the door does not swing onto the platform or toward the walk. This platform shall extend at least one (1) foot beyond each side of the doorway.

Each building shall have at least one (1) primary entrance which is accessible to individuals in wheelchairs. In multi-story buildings, such primary entrance shall provide access to an elevator either on a level plane or by ramp.

Doors shall have a clear opening of no less than thirty-two (32) inches when fully open and shall be operable by a single effort. The floor on the inside and outside of each doorway shall be level for a distance of five (5) feet from the door in the direction the door swings and shall extend one (1) foot beyond each side of the door. Sharp inclines and abrupt changes in level shall be avoided at doorsills. As much as practicable, thresholds shall be flush with the floor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(a, d); Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-105.
Public parking.

Where public parking is provided, at least one (1) parking area shall be made accessible to the building by either placing it at the grade level of one (1) floor of the building or providing ramps at curbs or steps between the parking area and the building.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(b); Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-107.
Ramps.

Where ramps are necessary or desired, they shall conform to the following specifications:

The ramp shall not have a slope greater than one (1) foot rise in twelve (12) feet of run, or eight and thirty-three one-hundredths percent (8.33%), or four (4) degrees fifty (50) minutes.

Any such ramp shall have a handrail on at least one (1) side, and preferably two (2) sides. The top of handrails shall be thirty-two (32) inches above the surface of the ramp and shall extend one (1) foot beyond the top and bottom of the ramp.

The ramp shall be at least thirty-two (32) inches wide (inside clear measurements) and have a surface that is nonslip.

If a door swings out onto the platform or toward the ramp, the platform of the ramp shall be at least five (5) feet by five (5) feet. This platform size shall be clear of door swing.

If the door does not swing onto the platform or toward the ramp, this platform shall be at least three (3) feet deep and five (5) feet wide. This platform size shall be clear of door swing.

The bottom of the ramp shall have at least a six-foot level run.

Where the ramp exceeds thirty (30) feet in length, level platforms shall be provided at thirty-foot intervals. Level platforms shall also be provided at turns in the ramp. Platforms shall be at least thirty-two (32) inches wide by five (5) feet long.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(c); Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-109.
Steps and stairs.

Steps in stairs shall be designed wherever practicable so as not to have abrupt (square) nosing. Stairs shall have handrails thirty-two (32) inches high as measured from the tread at the face of the riser. Stairs shall have at least one (1) handrail that extends at least eighteen (18) inches beyond the top step and beyond the bottom step. Steps should, wherever possible, and in conformation with existing step formulas, have risers that do not exceed seven (7) inches.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(e); Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-111.
Floors.

Floors shall wherever practicable have a surface that is nonslip. Floors on the same story shall be of a common level throughout or be connected by a ramp in accord with Section 43-6-107.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(f); Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-113.
Toilet facilities.

An appropriate number of toilet rooms shall be accessible to, and usable by, the physically handicapped and shall have space to allow traffic of individuals in wheelchairs.

Toilet rooms for each sex shall have at least one (1) toilet stall that: (a) is three (3) feet wide; (b) is at least four (4) feet eight (8) inches, preferably five (5) feet deep; (c) has a door (where doors are used) that is thirty-two (32) inches wide and swings out; (d) has handrails on each side, thirty-three (33) inches high and parallel to the floor, one and one-half (11/2) inches in outside diameter, with one and one-half (11/2) inches clearance between rail and wall, and fastened securely at ends and center; and (e) has a water closet with the seat twenty (20) inches from the floor.

Such toilet rooms shall have at least one (1) lavatory with a narrow apron, which when mounted at standard height is usable by individuals in wheelchairs, or shall have lavatories mounted higher, when particular designs demand, so that they are usable by individuals in wheelchairs.

Mirrors and shelves shall be provided above such lavatory at a height as low as practicable and no higher than forty (40) inches above the floor, measured from the top of the shelf and the bottom of the mirror.

Toilet rooms for men which have wall-mounted urinals shall have an appropriate number of such urinals with the opening of the basin nineteen (19) inches from the floor, or shall have floor-mounted urinals that are on level with the main floor of the toilet room.

Toilet rooms shall have an appropriate number of towel racks, towel dispensers, and other dispensers and disposal units mounted with openings of dispensers or receptacles no higher than forty (40) inches from the floor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(g); Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-115.
Water supply.

An appropriate number of water fountains or other water dispensing means shall be accessible to, and usable by, the physically disabled. Water fountains or coolers shall have up-front spouts and controls. Water fountains or coolers shall be hand-operated or hand-and-foot operated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(h); Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-117.
Elevators.

Where elevators are to be provided, at least one (1) bank of elevators, or one (1) single elevator if installed in single units, shall be accessible to, and usable by, persons with physical disabilities at all levels normally used by the general public. Such bank of elevators or such single elevator shall be designed to allow for traffic by wheelchairs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(i); Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-119.
Switches and controls.

Switches and controls for light, heat, ventilation, windows, draperies, elevators, fire alarms, and all similar controls of frequent or essential use shall be placed within the reach of individuals in wheelchairs, and not to exceed forty-eight (48) inches from the floor level.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(j); Laws, 1972, § 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-121.
Removal of hazards.

Every effort shall be exercised to obviate all hazards to individuals with physical disabilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-102(k); Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-123.
Enforcement of article.

The State Board of Health shall be responsible for reviewing plans and specifications of the proposed building or improvements to determine whether the buildings referred to in Section 43-6-101 will be in compliance with this article. The board shall collect a fee from the state, county, municipality or other public agency proposing to contract for the construction, to cover the cost of such review. The fee shall be one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) of the estimated cost, with a maximum fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00), calculated and paid on the basis of the engineering estimate or architect’s estimate of the total cost of the particular work or improvement, which estimate is to be furnished to the state board of health along with the plans and specifications.

The State Board of Health shall not require that those state-funded buildings in existence or presently under construction comply with this article, except as to entrance ramps to facilitate ingress and egress; however, all buildings affected by this article on which design contracts are awarded after July 1, 1972, shall comply with such specifications. The state board of health is hereby further authorized to promulgate any rules that, in its discretion, are necessary to perform the duties delegated it by this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-103; Laws, 1972, ch. 516, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-6-125.
Public buildings designed or equipped to accommodate persons with disabilities to be marked by signs.

All public buildings constructed or remodeled in accordance with the standards and requirements of Sections 43-6-101 through 43-6-123, or containing facilities that are in compliance therewith, shall display a symbol which is white on a blue background. The specifications for this symbol shall be furnished by the state board of health indicating the location of such facilities designed for the physically handicapped. When a building contains an entrance other than the main entrance which is ramped or level for use by the physically handicapped persons, a sign showing its location shall be posted at or near the main entrance which shall be visible from the adjacent public sidewalk or way.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 369, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1975).